West Virginia, session 2025, HB3149.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. AID TO AT-RISK VETERANS. §9A-5-4. American Legion Grant Distribution Program. (a) Purpose and authority:(1) The purpose of this section is to establish a statutory framework that authorizes the state to provide one-time, lump-sum grants to all American Legion posts throughout West Virginia to sustain and aid service organizations in their mission to support veterans and community initiatives.(2) The Department of Veterans Assistance is authorized to administer the distribution of these grants to all chartered American Legion posts within the state without the need for an application.(3) No American Legion post shall be required to submit an application, report, or financial documentation as a condition of receiving the grant.(b) Grant distribution: (1) Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall determine the total number of chartered American Legion posts in West Virginia as of July 1, 2026.(2) The total appropriated amount for this program shall be divided equally among all eligible American Legion posts. Each post shall receive an equal share.(3) The department shall distribute the funds no later than October 1, 2026.(4) In the event of any disputes or errors regarding post eligibility, the department shall make reasonable efforts to verify the status of the affected post before the distribution deadline.(c) Funding allocation and budget appropriation:(1) The Legislature hereby finds that this program constitutes a necessary public purpose by supporting service organizations that provide critical community and veteran services.(2) The Governor shall include a line item in the proposed state budget for fiscal year 2026 and any necessary subsequent years to appropriate funding for the one-time grant distribution.(3) The total amount to be appropriated shall be divided equally among all chartered American Legion posts within the state.(d) Rules and reporting. (1) The department may propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, if necessary, to ensure the orderly and efficient administration of this program.(2) The department shall submit a report to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance no later than January 1, 2027, detailing the total number of grants distributed and the total amount expended under this section. This report shall not include any individual grant recipient information.